Florida, session 2026, HB495.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 403.9339, Florida Statutes, is
transferred, renumbered as section 604.75, Florida Statutes, and
amended to read:
604.75 403.9339 Golf course best management practices
certification.—
(1) SHORT TITLE.—This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Golf Course Best Management Practices
Certification Act."
(2) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.—The Legislature finds
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb495-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 495 2026
that, due to the foundational agricultural nature of golf
courses and since the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
Services oversees best management practices programs for sod
growing operations and for the green industry, it is appropriate
for the department to oversee golf course best management
practices certification. Certified participants must abide by
the best management practices governing the application of
fertilizer on sod.
(3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term
"department" means the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
Services.
(4)(1) To provide a means of documenting and ensuring
compliance with best management practices for fertilizer
application to golf courses, the turfgrass science program at
the University of Florida Institute of Food and Agricultural
Sciences, in coordination with the department, shall administer
a certification for golf course best management practices.
(5)(2) The turfgrass science program, in cooperation with
the department, shall:
(a) Provide training and testing programs in golf course
best management practices and may issue certificates
demonstrating satisfactory completion of the training.
(b) Approve training and testing programs in golf course
best management practices that are equivalent to or more
comprehensive than the programs provided by the turfgrass
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb495-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 495 2026
science program under this subsection paragraph (a). Such
programs must be reviewed and reapproved by the turfgrass
science program if significant changes are made.
(6)(3) To obtain a golf course best management practices
certification, an applicant must submit to the turfgrass science
program a copy of the training certificate issued under
subsection (5) subsection (2).
(7)(4) A golf course best management practices
certification issued under this section expires 4 years after
the date of issuance. Upon expiration of the certification, or
after a grace period of not more than 30 days after the
expiration date, a recertification may be issued.
(8)(5) To obtain a golf course best management practices
recertification, an applicant must submit to the turfgrass
science program proof of having completed 8 classroom hours of
continuing education, of which at least 2 hours must address
fertilizer best management practices.
(9)(6) A person certified under this section is exempt
from:
(a) Additional local training.
(b) Local ordinances relating to water and fertilizer use
blackout periods or restrictions, unless a state of emergency is
declared. The certified person must continue to coordinate with
the local government to ensure that he or she adheres to the
comprehensive best management practices for that specific
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb495-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 495 2026
community.
(10)(7) This section does not exempt a person certified
under this section from complying with the rules and
requirements for basin management action plans set forth in s.
403.067(7) if the golf course is located in an area within a
basin management action plan.
(11)(a)(8)(a) The turfgrass science program may provide
the certification status of persons certified under this section
to local and state governmental entities.
(b) The turfgrass science program is encouraged to create
a registry of persons certified under this section on its
website.
Section 2. Type two transfer from the Department of
Environmental Protection.—
(1) All powers, duties, functions, records, offices,
personnel, associated administrative support positions,
property, pending issues, existing contracts, administrative
authority, administrative rules, and unexpended balances of
appropriations, allocations, and other funds relating to the
Golf Course Best Management Practices Certification program
within the Department of Environmental Protection are
transferred by a type two transfer, as defined in s. 20.06(2),
Florida Statutes, to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
Services.
100 (2) Any binding contract or interagency agreement existing
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb495-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 495 2026
101 before July 1, 2026, between the Department of Environmental
102 Protection, or an entity or agent of the department, and any
103 other agency, entity, or person relating to the Golf Course Best
104 Management Practices Certification program shall continue as a
105 binding contract or agreement for the remainder of the term of
106 such contract or agreement on the successor entity responsible
107 for the program, activity, or functions relative to the contract
108 or agreement.
109 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb495-00